Hawaii statutes.
[§27-52] Duties of the board. The
board shall:

(1) Propose key community outcomes of well-being for
the residents of the State to the legislature, and report to the legislature
and the citizens of Hawaii on progress in attaining the outcomes adopted by the
legislature;

(2) Execute an agreement between the federal
government, the state executive branch, and representatives of philanthropy and
community service organizations to encourage intergovernmental partnerships
with federal agencies and state, county, and community organizations for the
purpose of measuring results in exchange for fiscal and regulatory flexibility
in achieved shared goals;

(3) Increase the use of performance measurement
initiatives in each state agency through the governor's cabinet; and

(4) Increase the number of performance partnerships
between federal, state, county, and community-based agencies through the
governor's cabinet. [L 1999, c 160, §14]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next